Illinois, session 104th, HB3178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Digital Voice and Likeness Protection Act 5is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 550/10)7    Sec. 10. Unenforceable agreements.8    (a) A provision in an agreement between an individual and 9any other person for the performance of personal or 10professional services is contrary to public policy and is 11deemed unenforceable only as it relates to a new performance, 12fixed on or after January 1, 2026, by a digital replica of an 13individual if the provision meets all of the following 14conditions:15        (1) the provision allows for the creation and use of a 16    digital replica of the individual's voice or likeness in 17    place of work the individual would otherwise have 18    performed in person;19        (2) the provision does not include a reasonably 20    specific description of the intended uses of the digital 21    replica; and22        (3) the individual was not either:23            (A) represented by legal counsel who negotiated on   HB3178 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10229 SPS 20303 b1        behalf of the individual licensing his or her digital 2        replica rights and the licensing terms governing the 3        use of the applicable digital replica exist in a 4        written agreement; or5            (B) represented by a labor union representing 6        workers who do the proposed work and the terms of the 7        labor union's individual's collective bargaining 8        agreement expressly covers uses of digital replicas as 9        that term is defined in this Act or in the individual's 10        collective bargaining agreement.11    (b) The failure to include a reasonably specific 12description of the intended uses of a digital replica as 13described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) shall not render 14a provision in an agreement unenforceable when the uses of the 15digital replica are consistent with the terms of the contract 16for the performance of personal or professional services and 17the fundamental character of the photography or sound track as 18recorded or performed.19    (c) This Section does not affect any provision of a 20contract other than a provision described in subsection (a) 21and does not impact, abrogate, or otherwise affect any 22exclusivity grants contained in, or related to, a provision 23subject to subsection (a). 24(Source: P.A. 103-830, eff. 8-9-24.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 261, 2026.